Illinois, session 104th, SB601.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health Inpatient Facility Access Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (405 ILCS 140/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Mental Health Inpatient Facility Access Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-913, eff. 5-27-22.)